Florida, session 2026, SB932.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 218.137, Florida Statutes, is created to 16 read: 17 218.137âOffset for ad valorem tax revenue loss affecting 18 fiscally constrained counties.â 19 (1)âBeginning in the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the Legislature 20 shall appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem 21 tax revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as 22 defined in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 23 implementation of the amendment to s. 3(a), Art. VII of the 24 State Constitution approved at the November 2026 general 25 election. The moneys appropriated for this purpose shall be 26 distributed in January of each fiscal year among the fiscally 27 constrained counties based on each countyâs proportion of the 28 total reduction in ad valorem tax revenue resulting from the 29 implementation of the amendment to s. 3(a), Art. VII of the 30 State Constitution. 31 (2)âOn or before November 15 of each year, each fiscally 32 constrained county shall apply to the Department of Revenue to 33 participate in the distribution of the appropriation and provide 34 documentation supporting the countyâs estimated reduction in ad 35 valorem tax revenue in the form and manner prescribed by the 36 Department of Revenue. The documentation must include an 37 estimate of the reduction in taxable value directly attributable 38 to the amendment to s. 3(a), Art. VII of the State Constitution 39 approved at the November 2026 general election for all county 40 taxing jurisdictions within the county and must be prepared by 41 the property appraiser in each fiscally constrained county. The 42 documentation must also include the county millage rates 43 applicable in all such jurisdictions for the current year and 44 the prior year, rolled-back rates determined as provided in s. 45 200.065 for each county taxing jurisdiction, and maximum millage 46 rates that could have been levied by majority vote pursuant to 47 s. 200.065(5). For purposes of this section, each fiscally 48 constrained countyâs reduction in ad valorem tax revenue shall 49 be calculated as 95 percent of the estimated reduction in 50 taxable value multiplied by the lesser of the 2026 applicable 51 millage rate or the applicable millage rate for each county 52 taxing jurisdiction in the current year. If a fiscally 53 constrained county fails to apply for the distribution, its 54 share shall revert to the fund from which the appropriation was 55 made. 56 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027, if 57 the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by CS/HJR 1215, 58 as adopted at the 2025 Regular Session, is approved at the next 59 general election or at an earlier special election specifically 60 authorized by law for that purpose.